Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the content otherwise requires:

"Agency contract" means an agreement
in which a student-athlete authorizes a person to negotiate or solicit on
behalf of the student-athlete a professional-sports-services contract or an
endorsement contract.

"Athlete agent" means an individual
who enters into an agency contract with a student-athlete or, directly or
indirectly, recruits or solicits a student-athlete to enter into an agency
contract. The term includes an individual who represents to the public that
the individual is an athlete agent. The term does not include a spouse,
parent, sibling, grandparent, or guardian of the student-athlete or an
individual acting solely on behalf of a professional sports team or
professional sports organization.

"Athletic director" means an
individual responsible for administering the overall athletic program of an
educational institution or, if an educational institution has separately
administered athletic programs for male students and female students, the
athletic program for males or the athletic program for females, as appropriate.

"Contact" means a communication,
direct or indirect, between an athlete agent and a student-athlete, to recruit
or solicit the student-athlete to enter into an agency contract.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Endorsement contract" means an
agreement under which a student-athlete is employed or receives consideration
to use, on behalf of the other party, any value that the student-athlete may
have because of publicity, reputation, following, or fame obtained because of
athletic ability or performance.

"Intercollegiate sport" means a sport
played at the collegiate level for which eligibility requirements for
participation by a student-athlete are established by a national association
for the promotion or regulation of collegiate athletics.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"Professional-sports-services
contract" means an agreement under which an individual is employed, or
agrees to render services, as a player on a professional sports team, with a
professional sports organization, or as a professional athlete.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Registration" means registration as
an athlete agent pursuant to this chapter.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States.

"Student-athlete" means an individual
who engages in, is eligible to engage in, or may be eligible in the future to
engage in, any intercollegiate sport. If an individual is permanently
ineligible to participate in a particular intercollegiate sport, the individual
is not a student-athlete for purposes of that sport. [L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next